Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska49-14,103
Contract; conflict of interest; voidable; decree.

(1) A contract involving a prohibited conflict of interest under section 49-14,102 shall be voidable only by decree of a court of proper jurisdiction in an action brought by any citizen of this state as to any person that entered into the contract or took assignment thereof, with actual knowledge of the prohibited conflict. In the case of a person other than an individual, the actual knowledge must be that of an individual or body finally approving the contract for the person.

(2) An action to void any contract shall be brought within one year after discovery of circumstances suggesting the existence of a violation.

(3) Any such decree voiding such contract may, to meet the ends of justice, provide for the reimbursement of any person for the reasonable value of all money, goods, material, labor, or services furnished under the contract, to the extent that the state or political subdivision has benefited thereby.

(4) Sections 49-14,102 and 49-14,103 shall not apply to a contract for labor which is negotiated or is being negotiated pursuant to the laws of this state.

Laws 1976, LB 987, § 103;

Laws 2005, LB 242, § 47.